Louisiana, session 2026, HB161.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 320(J)(1) is hereby amended and
reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 320(J)(4) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 320. Conditions of bail undertaking
* * *
J.(1) Crimes of violence and human trafficking offenses. Notwithstanding
the provisions of Paragraph G of this Article and notwithstanding any other provision
of law to the contrary, if the defendant is alleged to have committed a crime of
violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B), human trafficking in violation of R.S. 14:46.2,
or trafficking of children for sexual purposes in violation of R.S. 14:46.3, the court
shall require as a condition of bail that the defendant refrain from going to the
residence or household of the victim, the victim's school, and the victim's place of
employment or otherwise contacting the victim in any manner whatsoever, and shall
refrain from having any further contact with the victim. The court shall also require
as a condition of bail that the defendant be prohibited from communicating, by
electronic communication, in writing, or orally, with a victim of the offense, or with
any of the victim's immediate family members. This condition does not apply if the
victim consents by way of a request to the court and the court issues an order
permitting the communication. If an immediate family member of the victim
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 161 ENROLLED
consents by way of a request to the court and the court issues an order permitting the
communication, then the defendant may contact that person.
* * *
(4) If the defendant is alleged to have committed the offense of human
trafficking in violation of R.S. 14:46.2 or trafficking of children for sexual purposes
in violation of R.S. 14:46.3, the court shall require as a condition of bail that the
defendant refrain from engaging in any of the following work:
(a) A transportation network company driver as provided in Part C of
Chapter 4 of Title 45 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(b) Operation of any bus, taxicab, or limousine for hire as defined in R.S.
15:553.
(c) A service worker who goes into a residence to provide any type of
service.
(d) Operation of any carnival or amusement ride as defined in R.S. 15:553.
(e) A door-to-door solicitor, peddler, or itinerant vendor selling any type of
goods or services including magazines or periodicals or subscriptions to magazines
or periodicals.
(f) Supervisory or disciplinary authority over children.
(g) Operation or participation in the governance of any early learning center
as defined in R.S. 17:407.33, residential home as defined in R.S. 46:1403, or
residence in which child care services are provided by a family child care provider
or in-home provider who is registered pursuant to R.S. 17:407.61 et seq.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.